Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.430

Pelvic exams.

(1) A health care provider licensed under this title may not knowingly perform or authorize a student practicing under their authority to perform a pelvic examination on a patient who is anesthetized or unconscious unless:

(a) The patient or a person authorized to make health care decisions for the patient gave specific informed consent to the examination;

(b) The examination is necessary for diagnostic or treatment purposes; or

(c) Sexual assault is suspected, evidence may be collected if the patient is not capable of informed consent due to longer term medical condition, or if evidence will be lost.

(2) A licensed health care provider who violates subsection (1) of this section is subject to discipline pursuant to this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act.

[ 2020 c 187 s 1.]